Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 3. Voting Equipment and Systems.

§ 24.2-625.
Application of Title 24.2 and general law.

All of the provisions of this title and general law not inconsistent with the provisions of this article shall apply to elections in counties, cities, and towns adopting and using electronic voting or counting machines.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-315; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-225; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 2014, cc. 540, 576.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and deleted “mechanical or” following “using” and substituted “machines” for “systems.”

§ 24.2-625.1.
Voting equipment security.

Records of the State Board of Elections or of a local electoral board, to the extent such records describe protocols for maintaining the security of ballots or voting and counting equipment, or reveal the results of risk assessments of specific local electoral procedures, the release of which would compromise the security of any election, shall be confidential and excluded from inspection and copying under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

The State Board of Elections or a local electoral board may hold a closed meeting pursuant to the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act for the purpose of discussing protocols for maintaining the security of ballots or voting and counting equipment, or risk assessments of specific local electoral procedures, where discussion of such matters in open meeting would compromise the security of any election. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize a closed meeting to discuss any breach of security in the conduct of an election.

Two members of any local electoral board may conduct site visits for the sole purpose of investigating compliance with security policies and procedures. No such visit shall be deemed a meeting under the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act. However, prior to conducting such site visits, the board shall hold an open meeting, as defined in the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, and shall identify at that meeting its intention to conduct such site visits, the dates on which such visits will occur, and all polling places or other locations at which such visits will occur, withholding only information identifying secure sites at which voting and counting equipment or ballots are stored. No later than 30 days after any site visit has been conducted pursuant to this paragraph, the board shall hold an open meeting, as defined in the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, at which it shall identify each location visited and the date on which each such location was visited, withholding only information identifying secure sites at which voting and counting equipment or ballots are stored.

The electoral board of each county and city that utilizes electronic voting systems shall develop and annually update written plans and procedures to ensure the security and integrity of its electronic voting systems. The general registrar and the State Board shall provide the electoral board assistance, upon request.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the release of information concerning any breach of security in the conduct of an election.

History.

2005, c. 568; 2007, c. 794.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 794 inserted subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as present subsection E.

§ 24.2-625.2.
Wireless communications at polling places.

There shall be no wireless communications on election day, while the polls are open, between or among voting machines within the polling place or between any voting machine within the polling place and any equipment outside the polling place. For purposes of this section, the term wireless communication shall mean the ability to transfer information via electromagnetic waves without the use of electrical conductors.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to voting machines purchased by any locality before July 1, 2007.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit the operation of electronic pollbook devices at polling places on election day.

History.

2007, cc. 939, 943; 2008, cc. 87, 393.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 939 and 943, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Elections shall be authorized to determine the equitable allocation of any federal or state funds made available to implement the provisions of this act among the counties and cities of the Commonwealth.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 87 and 393 are identical, and added the last two paragraphs.

§ 24.2-626.
Governing bodies shall acquire electronic voting systems.

The governing body of each county and city shall provide for the use of electronic voting systems, of a kind approved by the State Board, at every precinct and for all elections held in the county, the city, or any part of the county or city.Each county and city governing body shall purchase, lease, lease purchase, or otherwise acquire such systems and may provide for the payment therefor in the manner it deems proper. Systems of different kinds may be adopted for use and be used in different precincts of the same county or city, or within a precinct or precincts in a county or city, subject to the approval of the State Board.

On and after July 1, 2020, no county or city shall use any direct recording electronic machine (DRE) in elections in the county or city.

History.

Code 1950, § 242-291; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-203; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1972, c. 620; 1974, c. 428; 1976, c. 616; 1982, c. 650; 1985, c. 458; 1987, c. 129; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 258; 2000, c. 280; 2007, cc. 939, 943; 2009, cc. 751, 759; 2010, cc. 356, 533; 2011, cc. 153, 447, 481; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2016, c. 464.

Cross references.

As to the minimum number of voting machines or devices in the various precincts, see now §

24.2-627

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 939 and 943, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Elections shall be authorized to determine the equitable allocation of any federal or state funds made available to implement the provisions of this act among the counties and cities of the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2011, cc. 447 and 481, cl. 2 provides: “That the amendment to subdivision 3 of §

24.2-626

of the Code of Virginia enacted in 2011 shall expire June 30, 2012, and the authorization provided in that subdivision thereafter shall be applicable only for acquisitions of DREs from other localities within the Commonwealth, from among their existing inventories.”

Acts 2016, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 280 inserted “or within a precinct or precincts in a county or city” in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 939 and 943 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 751 and 759 are nearly identical, and in the last paragraph, added “except as provided herein” at the end of the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 356 and 533 are identical, and inserted subdivision 1 and 2 designations in the last paragraph, made a stylistic change in subsection 2, and inserted subdivision 3.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 153 added subdivision 4.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 447 and 481 expire June 30, 2012, are identical, and in subdivision 3, in the first sentence, deleted “from another locality within the Commonwealth, from among their existing inventories” following “DREs” and substituted “express” for “expressed,” in the second sentence, substituted “shall notify the State Board at least 30 days prior to acquiring” for “shall notify the State Board when acquiring,” and added the last sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and in the first and second paragraphs substituted “machines” for “systems.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 464, effective July 1, 2020, in subsection A, substituted “systems” for “or counting machines” in the first paragraph, substituted “systems” for “machines” in the second paragraph, and deleted the former third paragraph prohibiting localities from acquiring direct recording electronic machines or DREs and exceptions thereto; and added subsection B.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 24.2-626.1.
Acquisition and use of accessible voting devices.

The governing body of any county or city shall provide for the use of a voting or counting system in all elections that shall:

Provide for at least one voting system equipped for individuals with disabilities at each polling place, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for access and participation (including privacy and independence) as for other voters; and

Provide alternative language accessibility when required by § 203 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. § 10503).

History.

2007, cc. 939, 943.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 939 and 943, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Elections shall be authorized to determine the equitable allocation of any federal or state funds made available to implement the provisions of this act among the counties and cities of the Commonwealth.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “52 U.S.C. § 10503” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 1973aa-1a” to conform to the editorial reclassification of Title 52, U.S.C., effective September 1, 2014.

§ 24.2-627.
Electronic voting systems; number required.

The governing body of any county or city that adopts for use at elections ballot scanner machines shall provide for each precinct at least one voting booth with a marking device for each 425 registered voters or portion thereof and shall provide for each precinct at least one scanner. However, each precinct having more than 4,000 registered voters shall be provided with not less than two scanners at a presidential election, unless the governing body, in consultation with the general registrar and the electoral board, determines that a second scanner is not necessary at any such precinct on the basis of voter turnout and the average wait time for voters in previous presidential elections.

The local electoral board of any county or city shall be authorized to conduct any May general election, primary election, or special election held on a date other than a November general election with the number of voting systems determined by the board and the general registrar to be appropriate for each precinct, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A.

For purposes of applying this section, a general registrar may exclude persons voting absentee in his calculations, and if he does so shall send to the Department a statement of the number of voting systems to be used in each precinct. If the State Board finds that the number of voting systems is not sufficient, it may direct the general registrar to use more voting systems.

History.

1985, c. 458, §§ 24.1-203.1, 24.1-203.2; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 271; 1997, cc. 304, 336; 2010, c. 214; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2015, cc. 667, 740; 2016, cc. 18, 464, 492.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 214 added subsection D.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and, in subsection A, substituted “that” for “which,” “machines” for “voting systems” and “devices,” deleted “mechanical or” following “elections,” and inserted “recording”; in subsection B substituted “that” for “which,” “ballot scanner machines” for “any electronic system which requires the voter to vote a ballot which is inserted in an electronic counter,” and “scanner” for “counting device”; in subsection C substituted “counting machines” for “marking devices” and deleted “of this section” at the end.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 667 and 740 are nearly identical and added the second sentence of subsection B. Chapter 740 also substituted “Department” for “State Board” in the first sentence of subsection D.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and in subsection C, substituted “determined by the board and the general registrar to be” for “it determines is”; substituted “a general registrar” for “an electoral board,” “he does so” for “it does so, the electoral board” and “general registrar” for “local board” in subsection D.

The 2016 amendment by c. 464, effective July 1, 2020, deleted former subsection A pertaining to the minimum number of DREs per precinct; redesignated former subsections B through D as present subsections A through C; and, in subsection B, substituted “systems” for “or counting machines” and “subsection A” for “subsections A and B.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 24.2-628.
Repealed by Acts 2014, c. 540, cl. 2, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, cl. 2, effective April 4, 2014.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-628

, pertaining to authorized use of mechanical voting devices, derived from Code 1950, §§ 24-293, 24-294; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-204, 24.1-205; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-629.
State Board approval process of electronic voting systems.

Any person, firm, or corporation, referred to in this article as the “vendor,” manufacturing, owning, or offering for sale any electronic voting or counting machine and ballots designed to be used with such equipment may apply to the State Board, in the manner prescribed by the Board, to have examined a production model of such equipment and the ballots used with it. The Board may require the vendor to pay a reasonable application fee when he files his request for testing or certification of new or upgraded voting equipment. Receipts from such fees shall be credited to the Board for reimbursement of testing and certification expenses. In addition to any other materials that may be required, a current statement of the financial status of the vendor, including any assets and liabilities, shall be filed with the Board; if the vendor is not the manufacturer of the equipment for which application is made, such a statement shall also be filed for the manufacturer. These statements shall be exempt from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.). The Board shall require, at a site of its choosing, a demonstration of such equipment and ballots and may require that a production model of the equipment and a supply of ballots be provided to the Board for testing purposes. The Board shall also require the vendor to provide documentation of the practices recommended by the vendor to ensure the optimum security and functionality of the system.

The Board may approve any kind of electronic voting system that meets the following requirements:

It shall provide clear instructions for voters on how to mark or select their choice and cast that vote.

It shall provide facilities for voting for all offices at any election and on as many questions as may be submitted at any election.

It shall be capable of processing ballots for all parties holding a primary election on the same day, but programmable in such a way that an individual ballot cast by a voter is limited to the party primary election in which the voter chooses to participate.

It shall require votes for presidential and vice presidential electors to be cast for the presidential and vice presidential electors of one party by one operation. The ballot shall contain the words “Electors for” preceded by the name of the party or other authorized designation and followed by the names of the candidates for the offices of President and Vice President.

It shall enable the voter to cast votes for as many persons for an office as lawfully permitted, but no more. It shall prevent the voter from casting a vote for the same person more than once for the same office. However, ballot scanner machines shall not be required to prevent a voter from voting for a greater number of candidates than he is lawfully entitled to.

It shall enable the voter to cast a vote on any question on which he is lawfully permitted to vote, but no other.

It shall provide the voter with an opportunity to correct any error before a ballot is cast.

It shall correctly register or record and accurately count all votes cast for candidates and on questions.

It shall be provided with a “protective counter,” whereby any operation of the machine before or after the election will be detected.

It shall be provided with a counter that at all times during an election shall show how many persons have voted.

It shall ensure voting in absolute secrecy. Ballot scanner machines shall provide for the secrecy of the ballot and a method to conceal the voted ballot.

It shall be programmable to allow ballots to be separated when necessary.

It shall retain each printed ballot cast.

Ballot scanner machines shall report, if possible, the number of ballots on which a voter undervoted or overvoted.

After its examination of the equipment, ballots, and other materials submitted by the vendors, the Board shall prepare and file in its office a report of its finding as to (i) the apparent capability of such equipment to accurately count, register, and report votes; (ii) whether the system can be conveniently used without undue confusion to the voter; (iii) its accessibility to voters with disabilities; (iv) whether the system can be safely used without undue potential for fraud; (v) the ease of its operation and transportation by voting equipment custodians and officers of election; (vi) the financial stability of the vendor and manufacturer; (vii) whether the system meets the requirements of this title; (viii) whether the system meets federal requirements; (ix) whether issues of reliability and security identified with the system by other state governments have been adequately addressed by the vendor; and (x) whether, in the opinion of the Board, the potential for approval of such system is such as to justify further examination and testing.

If the Board determines that there is such potential and prior to its final determination as to approval or disapproval of such system, the Board shall obtain a report by an independent electronics or engineering consultant as to (i) whether the system accurately counts, registers, and reports votes; (ii) whether it is capable of storing and retaining existing votes in a permanent memory in the event of power failure during and after the election; (iii) the number of separate memory capabilities for the storage of recorded votes; (iv) its mechanical and electronic perfections and imperfections; (v) the audit trail provided by the system; (vi) the anticipated frequency of repair; (vii) the ease of repair; (viii) the anticipated life of the equipment; (ix) its potential for fraudulent use; (x) its accessibility to voters with disabilities; (xi) the ease of its programming, transportation, and operation by voting equipment custodians and officers of election; and (xii) any other matters deemed necessary by the Board. Failure by an applicant to cooperate with the consultant by furnishing information and production equipment and ballots requested shall be deemed a withdrawal of the application, but nothing in this section shall require the disclosure of trade secrets by the applicant. If such trade secrets are essential to the proper analysis of the system and are provided for that reason, the consultant shall subscribe to an oath subject to the penalty for perjury that he will neither disclose nor make use of such information except as necessary for the system analysis. The report of the consultant shall be filed in the office of the Board.

In preparing the reports cited in subsections C and D, the Board shall require, as a condition of certification, that the system is comprehensively examined by individuals including at least one expert in election management and one in computer system security. The Board shall develop, in conjunction with the above listed individuals, a specific set of items to be examined and tested as part of the certification process to further elaborate on the requirements identified in this section.

If the Board determines that there is potential for approval of the system and prior to its final determination, the Board shall also require that the system be tested in an actual election in one or more counties or cities. Its use at such election shall be as valid for all purposes as if it had been legally approved by the Board and adopted by the counties or cities.

If, following testing, the Board approves any voting system and its ballots for use, the Board shall so notify the electoral boards of each county and city. Systems so approved may be adopted for use at elections as herein provided. No form of voting system and ballots not so approved shall be adopted by any county or city. Any voting system and ballots approved for use by the Board shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this title and any applicable federal laws, and their use in any election shall be valid.

A vendor whose voting system is approved for use shall provide updates concerning its recommended practices for optimum security and functionality of the system, as may be requested by the Board. Any product for which requested updates are not provided shall be deemed non-compliant and may be decertified at the discretion of the Board.

The Board shall have the authority to investigate, at its discretion, any voting system certified in Virginia to ensure that it continues to meet the standards outlined in subsections C and D. The Board may, at its discretion, decertify any voting system based on significant problems detected with the voting system in Virginia or on reports provided by federal authorities or other state election officials.

History.

1985, c. 458, §§ 24.1-207.1; 1986, c. 558, § 24.1-206.3; 1993, c. 641; 1994, cc. 287, 742; 2001, cc. 640, 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, cc. 409, 993, 1010; 2007, c. 794; 2008, c. 703; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2020, c. 294.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 640 added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2001 amendment by c. 641 added the last two sentences in subsection B.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, inserted the second and third sentences in subsection A.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 409 inserted subsection B1 and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 993 and 1010 are identical, and substituted “that” for “which” in subsection B; in subsection C, added present clause (viii) and redesignated former clause (viii) as (ix) and made a related change; and inserted “and any applicable federal laws” in subsection F.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 794 added the last sentence to subsection A; and added subsection G.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 703, in subsection C, inserted clause (ix), redesignated former clause (ix) as clause (x) and made related changes; added subsections D1 and H; and added the last sentence in subsection G.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and deleted “hereinafter” following “corporation” in subsection A, inserted “in this article,” and substituted “machine” for “system” and “equipment” for “system” twice; rewrote subsection B; redesignated subdivision D 1 as subsection E and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in subsections G and H substituted “voting” for “electronic” throughout the subsections; and deleted “annual” preceding “updates” and “to the State Board” following “updates” in subsection H, inserted “as may be requested by the Board,” and substituted “requested” for “annual.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 294, added a new subdivision B 13 and redesignated former subdivision B 13 as subdivision B 14.

§ 24.2-630.
Experimental use of approved systems.

With the approval of the State Board, the governing body of any county, city, or town may provide for the experimental use at an election in one or more election districts or precincts of a voting or counting system which it might legally adopt without a formal adoption thereof, and its use at such election shall be valid for all purposes.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-295; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-206; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-631.
Experimental use of voting systems and ballots prior to approval of the system.

The State Board is authorized to approve the experimental use of voting or counting systems and ballots for the purpose of casting and counting absentee ballots in one or more counties and cities designated by the Board (i) that have established central absentee voter election districts and (ii) whose electoral board and general registrar submit to the Board for approval a plan for the use of such system and ballots. The Board is also authorized to approve the experimental use of voting or counting systems and ballots in one or more precincts in any county or city whose electoral board and general registrar submit to the Board for approval a plan for such use. The use of such systems and ballots at an election shall be valid for all purposes.

History.

1980, c. 639, § 24.1-206.1; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and twice substituted “electoral board and general registrar submit” for “electoral board submits.”

§ 24.2-632.
Voting equipment custodians.

For the purpose of programming and preparing voting and counting equipment, including the programming of any electronic activation devices or data storage media used to program or operate the equipment, and maintaining, testing, calibrating, and delivering it, the electoral board and general registrar shall employ one or more persons, to be known as custodians of voting equipment. The custodians shall be fully competent, thoroughly instructed, and sworn to perform their duties honestly and faithfully, and for such purpose shall be appointed and instructed at least 30 days before each election. With the approval of the State Board, the electoral board or general registrar may contract with the voting equipment vendor or another contractor for the purpose of programming, preparing and maintaining the voting equipment. The voting equipment custodians shall instruct and supervise the vendor or contractor technicians and oversee the programming, testing, calibrating and delivering of the equipment. The vendor or contractor technicians shall be sworn to perform their duties honestly and faithfully and be informed of and subject to the misdemeanor and felony penalties provided in §§

24.2-1009

and

24.2-1010

.

The final testing of the equipment prior to each election shall be done in the presence of an electoral board member, a representative of the electoral board, or the general registrar. The electoral board or general registrar may authorize a representative to be present at the final testing only if it is impracticable for a board member or general registrar to attend, and such representative shall in no case be the custodian or a vendor or contractor technician who was responsible for programming the ballot software, electronic activation devices, or electronic data storage media.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the local electoral board or general registrar may assign a board member or a deputy registrar to serve as a custodian without pay for such service. The board member or deputy registrar serving as custodian shall be fully competent, thoroughly instructed, and sworn to perform his duties honestly and faithfully, and for such purpose shall be appointed and instructed at least 30 days before each election. Whenever the presence of an electoral board member or general registrar and custodian is required by the provisions of this title, the same person shall not serve in both capacities.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-296, 24-299; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-209; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1981, c. 570; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 1999, c. 219; 2004, cc. 993, 1010; 2016, cc. 18, 492; 2022, c. 140.

The 1999 amendment

added subsection B.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 993 and 1010 are identical, and in the first paragraph of subsection A, substituted “purpose of programming and preparing voting and counting equipment, including the programming of any electronic activation devices or data storage media used to program or operate the equipment,
and maintaining, testing, calibrating, and delivering it” for “purpose of placing ballots in the frames of the voting equipment, putting voting and counting equipment in order, and setting, testing, adjusting, and delivering it” and “30 days” for “thirty days” and added the third, fourth and fifth sentences; in the second paragraph of subsection A, added “or a vendor or contractor technician who was responsible for programming
the ballot software, electronic activation devices, or electronic data storage media” to the end of the second sentence; and in subsection B, substituted “30 days” for “thirty days” and deleted the last sentence, which read: “The provisions of this subsection shall be applicable only in a county or city which uses mark sense ballots in combination with electronic counting equipment for the conduct of elections.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and inserted “and general registrar” or “or general registrar” following “electoral board” throughout, inserted “or general registrar” following “board member” twice, inserted “assistant” preceding “registrar” twice in subsection B, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 in subsection B, substituted “a deputy” for “an assistant” and “or deputy” for “or assistant.”

§ 24.2-633.
Notice of final testing of voting system; sealing equipment.

Before the final testing of voting or counting machines for any election, the general registrar shall mail written notice (i) to the chairman of the local committee of each political party, or (ii) in a primary election, to the chairman of the local committee of the political party holding the primary, or (iii) in a city or town council election in which no candidate is a party nominee and which is held when no other election having party nominees is being conducted, to the candidates.

The notice shall state the time and place where the machine will be tested and state that the political party or candidate receiving the notice may have one representative present while the equipment is tested.

At the time stated in the notice, the representatives, if present, shall be afforded an opportunity to see that the equipment is in proper condition for use at the election. When a machine has been so examined by the representatives, it shall be sealed with a numbered seal in their presence, or if the machine cannot be sealed with a numbered seal, it shall be locked with a key. The representatives shall certify for each machine the number registered on the protective counter and the number on the seal. When no party or candidate representative is present, the custodian shall seal the machine as prescribed in this section in the presence of a member of the electoral board, the general registrar, or a designee of the electoral board or general registrar.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-300; 1962, c. 260; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-210; 1981, c. 425; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 1998, c. 264; 2004, cc. 993, 1010; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 993 and 1010 are identical, and substituted “the final testing of” for “preparing” in the first paragraph, “tested” for “prepared” twice in the second paragraph and “numbered seal” for “numbered metal seal” or “metal seal” in the third paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and, in the first and second paragraphs, substituted a variation of “machine” for “equipment”; in the third paragraph substituted “machine” for “device” throughout the subsection and “for each machine” for “as to the numbers of the devices; if mechanical voting devices are used, that all counters are set at zero (000)”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” in the first paragraph and “the general registrar, or a designee of the electoral board or general registrar” for “or its representative” in the last paragraph.

§ 24.2-634.
Locking and securing after preparation.

When voting equipment has been properly prepared for an election, it shall be locked against voting and sealed, or if a voting or counting machine cannot be sealed with a numbered seal, it shall be locked with a key. The equipment keys and any electronic activation devices shall be retained in the custody of the general registrar and delivered to the officers of election as provided in §

24.2-639

. After the voting equipment has been delivered to the polling places, the general registrar shall provide ample protection against tampering with or damage to the equipment.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-301; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-211; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 1998, c. 264; 2004, cc. 993, 1010; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 993 and 1010 are identical, and substituted “numbered seal” for “metal numbered seal” and inserted “and any electronic activation devices.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and deleted “or counting” following “When voting,” substituted “a voting or counting machine” for “the device,” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” twice.

§ 24.2-635.
Demonstration of equipment.

In each county, city, or town in which voting or counting equipment is to be used, the electoral board or general registrar may designate times and places for the exhibition of equipment containing sample ballots, showing the title of offices to be filled, and, so far as practicable, the names of the candidates to be voted for at the next election for the purpose of informing voters who request instruction on the use of the equipment. No equipment shall be used for such instruction after being prepared and sealed for use in any election. During exhibitions, the counting mechanism, if any, of the equipment may be concealed from view.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-304; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-214; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “may” for “shall” in the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and inserted “or general registrar” in the first sentence.

§ 24.2-636.
Instruction as to use of equipment.

No fewer than three nor more than 30 days before each election, the electoral board or general registrar shall instruct, or cause to be instructed, on the use of the equipment and his duties in connection therewith, each officer of election appointed to serve in the election who has not previously been so instructed. The board or the general registrar shall not permit any person to serve as an officer who is not fully trained to conduct an election properly with the equipment. This section shall not be construed to prevent the appointment of a person as an officer of election to fill a vacancy in an emergency.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-303; 1970, c. 462, §

24.2-213

; 1972, c. 620; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 1998, c. 187; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and substituted “30” for “thirty” and twice inserted “or general registrar.”

§ 24.2-637.
Furniture and equipment to be at polling places.

Before the time to open the polls, each electoral board shall ensure that the general registrar has the voting and counting equipment and all necessary furniture and materials at the polling places, with counters on the voting or counting devices set at zero (000), and otherwise in good and proper order for use at the election.

The general registrar shall have the custody of such equipment, furniture, and materials when not in use at an election and shall maintain the equipment in accurate working order and in proper repair.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-296, 24-299; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-209; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1981, c. 570; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and substituted “shall ensure that the general registrar has” for “shall have” in the first paragraph and “The general registrar” for “The board” in the second paragraph.